Hawaii statutes.
DIVISION
1. GOVERNMENT

TITLE 1.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Chapter

1 Common Law; Construction of Laws

1B Designation of Rural Areas for Federal
Programs

2 Statute Revision and Publication--Repealed

3 Uniformity of Legislation

4 Boundaries

4E State Board on Geographic Names

5 Emblems and Symbols

6 Memorials--Repealed

6D Protection of Caves

6E Historic Preservation

6F Judiciary History Center

6K Kaho‘olawe Island Reserve

7 Miscellaneous Rights of the People

8 Holidays and Periods of Recognition and
Observance

9 Foundation on Culture and the Arts

9C Ethnic Studies--Repealed

10 Office of Hawaiian Affairs

10H Native Hawaiian Recognition

CHAPTER 1

COMMON
LAW; CONSTRUCTION OF LAWS

Section

1-1 Common law of the State; exceptions

1-2 Certain laws not obligatory until
published

1-3 Laws not retrospective

1-4 Persons and property subject to laws

1-4.5 Cession of concurrent jurisdiction

1-5 Contracts in contravention of law

1-6 Prohibitory law, effect

1-7 Repeal of laws

1-8 No revivor on repeal; exception

1-9 Express or implied repeals

1-10 Effect of repeal on accrued rights

1-11 Effect of repeal on pending suit or
prosecution

1-12 Application of statutory construction
provisions

1-13 Official languages

1-13.5 Hawaiian language; spelling

1-14 Words have usual meaning

1-15 Construction of ambiguous context

1-16 Laws in pari materia

1-17 Number and gender

1-18 "Or", "and"

1-19 "Person", "others",
"any", etc.

1-20 "Month", "year"

1-21 "Oath"

1-22 "County"

1-23 Severability

1-24 Interpretation of uniform acts

1-25 References apply to amendments

1-26 References inclusive

1-27 Citations of laws included in supplements
and

replacement volumes

1-28 Service of notice by mail

1-28.5 Publication of notice

1-29 Computation of time

1-30 Hawaiian standard time applicable

1-31 Hawaiian standard time; definition;
observance

1-32 Acts to be done on holidays

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next